South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S905.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Natural Resources, relating to Shellfish Permit Applications, designated as Regulation Document Number 5439, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Department of Natural Resources proposes to amend Regulation 123-34(B) Shellfish Permits. The subject of the proposed action is to promulgate section 124-34(B)(2), to establish an expiration date for permit applications that do not receive an agency decision, request for additional information, or other official correspondence within twelve (12) months of the date of submission. The Notice of Drafting was published in Volume 49, Issue No. 10 of the South Carolina State Register on October 24, 2025. ----XX----